Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 4. Airport Construction

§ 10-3-401.
Grants-in-aid for airport construction and improvement and air service promotion; authority to make; limitation.

The commission may make grants-in-aid from state funds for construction and development of airports to counties, cities, towns and joint powers boards within the state. No grant-in-aid for planning, construction or improvement of any airport shall be made unless the airport is owned, leased or held under a state or federal special use permit or agreement, exclusively or jointly, by the county, city, town or joint powers board to which the grant is made. Grants may be spent for runways, terminals, hangars and other improvements and for planning any improvements to the airport. The commission may designate state funds for purposes of creating, amending and updating any system plan of an airport for the state.

The commission may grant not more than five percent (5.0%) of the amount available for grants-in-aid under subsection (a) of this section to counties, cities and towns to promote air service in Wyoming. In accordance with W.S.

10-3-402

, any amount granted under this subsection shall be equally matched by the recipient county, city or town. No amount granted under this subsection shall be used for airline subsidies.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 45, § 3.

In administering the grant program, and in consultation with the Federal Aviation Administration and local airport sponsors, the commission shall establish, amend and have available, at least one hundred twenty (120) days before each biennial legislative budget session, a five (5) year capital improvement plan for airports in the state and a system for prioritizing projects to be funded by state and federal grants.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 10-21; Laws 1969, ch. 37, § 1; 1975, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 10-2-108; Laws 1978, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 22, § 1; 1980, ch. 4, § 1; 1982, ch. 2, § 1; 1983, ch. 47, § 1; 1988, ch. 80, § 1; 1994, ch. 27, § 1; 1997, ch. 58, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2000, ch. 45, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 104, § 1.

§ 10-3-402.
Grants-in-aid for airport construction and improvement; expenditures by county, city or town.

Expenditure of state funds shall be made under the discretion of the commission.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 69 § 2; W.S. 1957, § 10-22; W.S. 1977, § 10-2-109; Laws 1978, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 22 § 1; 1980, ch. 4, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1; 1997, ch. 58, § 1; 2000, ch. 45, § 2; 2003, ch. 104, § 1.

§ 10-3-403.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

9-12-703

by Laws 2013, ch. 138, §
2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2000, ch. 45, § 1, related to loans for airport construction improvements and air service promotion.